Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20173-116
Enforcement; intergovernmental cooperation.

The division, the director, and every state, county, and municipal officer, charged with the enforcement of state and municipal laws, shall enforce and assist in the enforcement of the State Aeronautics Act, all rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant thereto, and all other laws of this state relating to aeronautics. In the aid of such enforcement, general police powers are hereby conferred upon the director, and such of the officers and employees of the division as may be designated by it, to exercise such powers. The division is further authorized, in the name of this state, to enforce the act and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant thereto by injunction in the courts of this state. Municipalities and persons owning privately owned public use airports are authorized to cooperate with the division in the development of aeronautics and aeronautical facilities in this state. The division may use the facilities and services of other agencies of the state to the utmost extent possible and such agencies are authorized and directed to make available such facilities and services.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 6(10), p. 85;

Laws 1995, LB 609, § 5;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 15.
July 1, 2017